Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-408
Statute of limitation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any action under the Minor Alcoholic Liquor Liability Act shall be brought within four years after the occurrence causing the injury, property damage, or death.

Laws 2007, LB573, § 8.